Louisiana, session 2026, HB477.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1049.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1049.1. Coverage for prosthetic and custom orthotic devices and services
A. As used in this Section:
(1) "Accredited facility" means any entity that is accredited by the American
Board for Certification in Orthotics, Prosthetics, and Pedorthics (ABCop) or by the
Board for Orthotist/Prosthetist Certification (BOC) and that provides prosthetic
devices or prosthetic services.
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-846 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 477
(2) "Advanced practice provider" means a healthcare professional who is
licensed in this state and authorized under state law to evaluate patients and to
prescribe orthotic and prosthetic devices within the provider's scope of practice.
(3) "Health coverage plan" means any hospital, health, or medical expense
insurance policy, hospital or medical service contract, employee welfare benefit plan,
contract or agreement with a health maintenance organization or a preferred provider
organization, health and accident insurance policy, or any other insurance contract
of this type, including a group insurance plan and the Office of Group Benefits
programs.
(4) "Prosthetic device" or "prosthesis" means an artificial limb designed to
maximize function, stability, and safety of the patient. The term does not include
artificial eyes, ears, noses, dental appliances, ostomy products, or devices such as
eyelashes or wigs.
(5) "Prosthetic services" means the science and practice of evaluating,
measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, aligning, adjusting, or
servicing of a prosthesis through the replacement of external parts of a human body
lost due to amputation or congenital deformities to restore function, cosmesis, or
both. It also includes any medically necessary clinical care.
(6) "Orthosis" means a custom-designed, custom-fabricated, custom-fitted,
pre-fabricated, or modified device to treat a neuromusculoskeletal disorder or
acquired condition.
(7) "Orthotic services" means the science and practice of evaluating,
measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting, aligning, adjusting, or
servicing a custom orthosis. Prosthetists, orthotic assistants, and orthotic fitters who
are credentialed by a nationally recognized Orthotic, Prosthetic and Pedorthic
certifying board or are licensed, if applicable, may be privileged based on written
objective criteria to provide orthotic care. Certified or licensed pedorthists may be
privileged based on written objective criteria to provide lower extremity orthotic
care.
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-846 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 477
B. Any health coverage plan specified in Subsection P of this Section that
is delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, or otherwise contracted for in this state on
or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for prosthetic and custom orthotic
devices and services. At a minimum, such coverage shall equal the coverage and
prevailing payment rates for prosthetic and orthotic devices provided under federal
laws and regulations for older adults and persons with disabilities pursuant to 42
U.S.C. 1395k, 1395l, and 1395m and 42 CFR 414.202, 414.210, 414.228, and
410.100. Covered benefits shall be provided for more than one prosthesis or orthosis
when medically necessary as further provided in this Section.
C. Eligibility for prosthetic and custom orthotic devices and services is based
on medical necessity as determined by the enrollee's physician or other advanced
practice provider. Medical necessity includes the most appropriate prosthesis or
custom orthosis that adequately meets the medical needs of the enrollee to restore or
maintain the ability to perform activities of daily living and essential job-related
functions.
D. In addition to the device required pursuant to Subsection B of this
Section, a prosthetic or custom orthotic device determined by the enrollee's
prosthetic or orthotic care provider to be the most appropriate device to meet the
enrollee's medical needs for purposes of performing physical activities including but
not limited to running, biking, swimming, and strength training, shall be covered
when the treating physician or other advanced practice provider determines that such
device is necessary to enable the enrollee to engage in physical activity and to
maximize whole-body health and lower or upper limb function.
E. In addition to the devices required pursuant to Subsections B and C of this
Section, a prosthetic or custom orthotic device determined by the enrollee's
prosthetic or orthotic care provider to be the most appropriate device to meet the
enrollee's medical needs for purposes of showering or bathing shall be covered when
the treating physician or other advanced practice provider determines that such
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-846 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 477
device is necessary to enable the enrollee to safely engage in bathing and showering
and to maintain whole-body health and lower or upper-limb function.
F. Coverage required by this Section includes all materials and components
necessary for the use of prosthetic and custom orthotic devices.
G. Coverage required by this Section includes instruction to the enrollee on
the proper use of the prosthetic or custom orthotic device.
H. Coverage required by this Section includes medically necessary repair or
replacement of a prosthetic or custom orthotic device. Payment shall be made for
the replacement of a device or any part thereof, without regard to continuous use or
useful lifetime restrictions, when an ordering healthcare provider determines that
replacement is necessary due to any of the following:
(1) A change in the physiological condition of the enrollee.
(2) An irreparable change in the condition of the device or a part of the
device.
(3) The condition of the device or part requires repairs, and the cost of such
repairs would exceed sixty percent of the cost of a replacement device or part.
I. A health coverage plan may require confirmation from the prescribing
healthcare provider if the prosthetic or custom orthotic device or part being replaced
is less than three years old.
J. A health coverage plan that covers prosthetic and custom orthotic devices
shall include in its evidence of coverage a description of the insured's rights under
this Section. Any denial of coverage based on medical necessity shall be in writing
and shall include clear reasoning and an explanation of how the request does not
meet medical necessity standards. Any denial or limit of coverage based on a lack
of medical necessity may be appealed in accordance with R.S. 22:3070 et seq.
Medical necessity determinations shall consider information and recommendations
from the treating physician in consultation with the enrollee, including information
in the medical record of the treating orthotist or prosthetist and the results of a
functional assessment. Such assessment shall consider but not be limited to all of the
following:
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-846 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 477
(1) The insured's past history, including prior use of prosthetic or orthotic
devices if applicable.
(2) The insured's current condition, including the status of the residual limb.
(3) The insured's desire to ambulate with respect to lower limb prosthetic
devices, maximize upper limb function with respect to upper limb prosthetic devices,
and the insured's desire and ability to use an orthosis to maintain functional abilities.
K. An individual health plan delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in
this state that covers prosthetic and custom orthotic devices shall consider these
benefits rehabilitative and habilitative services and devices for purposes of any state
or federal requirement for coverage of essential health benefits.
L. A health coverage plan may require prior authorization for prosthetic and
custom orthotic devices and services in the same manner as other covered benefits,
if such procedures are applied in a nondiscriminatory manner. Utilization review
procedures shall not deny coverage for habilitative or rehabilitative benefits,
including prosthetics or custom orthotics, solely on the basis of an insured's actual
or perceived disability.
M. A health coverage plan may impose co-payments, deductibles, or
coinsurance amounts on prosthetic and custom orthotic devices and services. Such
cost-sharing shall not be greater than that applied to other benefits under the plan.
Repair and replacement of prosthetic and custom orthotic devices shall be covered
subject to cost-sharing that is no more restrictive than that applied to other benefits,
unless necessitated by theft or loss.
N. A health coverage plan shall require that prosthetic and custom orthotic
devices be provided by an accredited facility. The prescription for such prosthetic
and custom orthotic services shall be issued by a licensed physician, and the
provision of these services shall occur at an accredited facility.
O. Coverage required in accordance with this Section shall be aligned with,
and not more restrictive than, the provisions applicable to other benefits within the
health coverage plan. An insurer shall not deny a prosthetic or custom orthotic
benefit to an individual with limb loss, limb absence, or limb impairment if such
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-846 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 477
benefits would otherwise be available to a non-disabled individual seeking medical
or surgical intervention to restore or maintain the ability to perform the same
physical activity.
P. A health coverage plan that provides coverage for prosthetic and custom
orthotic services shall ensure access to medically necessary clinical care for
prosthetic and custom orthotic devices and technology. There shall be a minimum
of two distinct prosthetic and custom orthotic service providers within this state who
are also part of the plan's authorized provider network. If medically necessary
covered orthotic or prosthetic devices or services are not available from an in-
network provider, the insurer shall establish and maintain a process to refer the
enrollee to an out-of-network provider. The insurer shall reimburse that provider at
a mutually agreed-upon rate, reduced only by the member's cost-sharing that would
apply if the service were obtained from an in-network provider.
Q. Each carrier that issues a health plan subject to this Section shall report
to the commissioner of insurance on its experience pursuant to this Section for plan
years 2027-2028. The report shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner of
insurance and shall include the number of claims and the total amount of claims paid
in this state for the services required by this Section. The commissioner of insurance
shall aggregate this data by plan year in a report and submit the report to the House
and Senate committees on insurance.
R. The provisions of this Section do not apply to limited benefit health
insurance policies or contracts.
Section 2. Part IX of Chapter 5-E of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1259.11, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IX. PROSTHETIC AND CUSTOM ORTHOTIC
DEVICES AND SERVICES COVERAGE
§1259.11. Prosthetic and custom orthotic devices and services; Medicaid coverage
A. The Louisiana Medicaid program shall provide coverage for prosthetic
and custom orthotic devices and services to an enrollee when such devices or
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-846 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 477
services are deemed medically necessary in accordance with the standards and
clinical criteria set forth by the Medicaid program.
B. Coverage includes the devices, services, materials, components,
instruction, repair, and replacement as delineated in R.S. 22:1049.1, including but
not limited to services required to restore or maintain the ability to perform activities
of daily living, essential job-related functions, and medically necessary physical
activity. The definitions provided in R.S. 22:1049.1 apply to this Section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
C. Pursuant to this Section, the secretary of the Louisiana Department of
Health shall do all of the following:
(1) Submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services all necessary
state plan amendments.
(2) Promulgate all necessary rules and regulation in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(3) Take any other actions necessary to implement the provisions of this
Chapter.
Section 3. R.S. 22:1049 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 4. The coverage requirements provided by the provisions of R.S. 22:1049.1
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act shall apply to any health coverage plan delivered, issued
for delivery, renewed, or otherwise contracted for in this state beginning January 1, 2027.
Section 5. The report required to be compiled and submitted to the commissioner
of insurance as required by the provisions of R.S. 22:1409.1(Q) as enacted by Section 1 of
this Act shall be due beginning July 1, 2029.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor, and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-846 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 477